Illinois, session 104th, HB2953.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Capital Development Board Act is amended by 5adding Section 10.20 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3105/10.20 new)7    Sec. 10.20. Database of non-sprinklered high-rise 8buildings.9    (a) Each municipality and county shall provide the Board a 10list of all high-rise apartment buildings in their respective 11jurisdictions that: 12        (1) meet the definition of high-rise apartment 13    building, as defined by Section 1 of the Apartment Fire 14    Instruction Act; 15        (2) were not subject to a requirement to include a 16    sprinkler system at the time the building was constructed; 17    and 18        (3) have not been retrofitted with a sprinkler system. 19    (b) A municipality or county shall provide this 20information no later than June 30, 2027, and on June 30 every 5 21years thereafter. 22    (c) The Board shall create an electronic database and make 23this information publicly available including, but not limited   HB2953- 2 -LRB104 07592 HLH 17636 b1to, a link on its website. The database shall include, but is 2not limited to, the property identification number, number of 3floors, number of units, and total square footage for each 4building. 5    (d) "Fire sprinkler system" shall have the same meaning as 6defined in Section 10 of the Fire Sprinkler Contractor 7Licensing Act.